Wyoming, session 2025, SF0042.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 12-4-416 is created to read:
12-4-416. Resort hotel liquor licenses; authorized;
requirements.
(a) The appropriate licensing authority in a county,
city or town may issue resort hotel liquor licenses to
applicants who are owners or lessees of a resort hotel that
satisfies all requirements specified in subsection (b) of
this section.
(b) To qualify for a resort hotel liquor license
under this section, the appropriate licensing authority
shall require the resort hotel to:
(i) Have an actual valuation of, or the
applicant shall commit to expend or have actually expended
on the resort hotel, not less than five million dollars
($5,000,000.00). Any valuation under this paragraph shall
include the value of the land on which the resort hotel is
located;
(ii) Include a full-service restaurant that
shall be open during regular business hours. At the
discretion of the appropriate licensing authority,
variances to this time requirement may be granted on a
seasonal basis. As used in this paragraph, "full-service
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0042
ENROLLED ACT NO. 7, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
restaurant" means a restaurant where waiters deliver food
and drink offered from a printed food menu to patrons at
tables or booths and that has a dining room or rooms,
kitchen and the number and kind of employees necessary for
the preparing, cooking and serving of meals;
(iii) Include within the resort hotel not less
than twenty (20) sleeping rooms for short-term occupancy;
(iv) Provide dining services to guest rooms for
not less than twelve (12) hours each day; and
(v) Provide facilities for business meetings
that can accommodate not less than fifty (50) participants.
Section 2. W.S. 12-1-101(a)(viii)(intro), (T) and by
creating a new subparagraph (W), 12-4-103(a)(iii), 12-4-403
through 12-4-405, 12-4-414(b)(iv), 12-4-415(b)(iv) and
12-5-201(f) are amended to read:
12-1-101. Definitions.
(a) As used in this title:
(viii) "Licensee" means a person holding a any
one (1) or more of the following:
(T) Special malt beverage permit issued
under W.S. 12-4-504; or
(W) Resort hotel liquor license.
12-4-103. Restrictions upon license or permit
applicants and holders; license limitation per person.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0042
ENROLLED ACT NO. 7, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) A license or permit authorized by this title
shall not be held by, issued or transferred to:
(iii) Any person who does not own the building
or hold a written lease for the period for which the
license will be effective containing an agreement by the
lessor that alcoholic or malt beverages may be sold upon
the leased premises, except as provided by paragraph (iv)
of this subsection. This paragraph shall not be interpreted
to prevent the use of a resort liquor license or a resort
hotel liquor license by a contractor or subcontractor as
permitted by W.S. 12-4-403(b);
12-4-403. Population formula not applicable;
contracting for services.
(a) The provisions authorizing resort liquor licenses
and resort hotel liquor licenses shall have no application
to the population formula limiting retail liquor licenses
as provided by W.S. 12-4-201.
(b) A resort liquor licensee or a resort hotel liquor
licensee may contract or subcontract for the provision of
food and beverage services on the licensed premises.
However, the resort liquor licensee shall remain subject to
all applicable laws, rules, regulations and penalties
including the provisions of W.S. 12-2-306 and 12-7-103.
12-4-404. Sale of beverages for off-premises
consumption prohibited.
Resort liquor licensees and resort hotel liquor licensees
shall not sell alcoholic or malt beverages for consumption
off the premises owned or leased by the licensee, except
pursuant to a catering permit. The dispensing of alcoholic
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0042
ENROLLED ACT NO. 7, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
or malt beverages licensed to be sold hereunder shall be
controlled by W.S. 12-5-201 and, if a catering permit has
been issued, by W.S. 12-4-502(b).
12-4-405. Annual fee.
The annual fee for a resort liquor license and a resort
hotel liquor license shall be not less than five hundred
dollars ($500.00) nor more than three thousand dollars
($3,000.00).
12-4-414. Winery permits; authorized; conditions;
satellite winery permits; direct shipment of wine; fees;
off-premises permits.
(b) The local licensing authority:
(iv) Shall assess a fee of not less than three
hundred dollars ($300.00) nor more than five hundred
dollars ($500.00) payable annually in advance for each
winery permit. When dual ownership of a winery permit and a
liquor license exists, no additional fee shall be assessed
other than the retail, restaurant, bar and grill, resort
hotel or resort license fee.
12-4-415. Microbrewery permits; authorized;
conditions; fees.
(b) The local licensing authority:
(iv) Shall assess a fee of not less than three
hundred dollars ($300.00) nor more than five hundred
dollars ($500.00) payable annually in advance for each
microbrewery permit. When dual ownership of a microbrewery
permit and a liquor license exists, no additional fee shall
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0042
ENROLLED ACT NO. 7, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
be assessed other than the retail, restaurant, bar and
grill, resort hotel or resort license fee.
12-5-201. Location, regulation and restrictions as to
place of sale; inspections.
(f) A holder of a resort hotel liquor license, a
resort retail liquor license, a golf club that holds a
retail liquor license, a restaurant liquor license or a
club limited retail liquor license or a holder of a retail
liquor license or restaurant liquor license operating on a
guest ranch may dispense alcoholic beverages from any
location within the boundaries of the licensee's premises.
Any holder of a resort hotel liquor license may sell an
unopened bottle of liquor or wine to a registered guest not
less than twenty-one (21) years of age for consumption on
the holder's premises. The premises shall be a single
property within a contiguous boundary upon which the
licensee is located and which shall be identified in the
license. Any location on the premises where alcoholic
beverages are dispensed as approved by the licensing
authority shall comply with applicable sanitation and fire
hazard requirements and other applicable laws. The
licensing authority shall, as often as necessary, inspect
the licensed location where alcoholic beverages are
dispensed to ensure that the licensee is in compliance with
sanitation and fire hazard requirements.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0042
ENROLLED ACT NO. 7, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
6